District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Disconnect Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Full school day” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1(2B) of
an Act To provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking of a school census in the
District of Columbia, and for other purposes, approved February 4, 1925 (43 Stat. 806; D.C.
Code § 38-201(2B)).
(2) “Health care needs” means specific medical requirements or disability- or
health-related supports that are documented by a licensed medical provider with the LEA and
that require the use of a personal wireless communication device for monitoring a medical
condition, administering medication, receiving health-related alerts, receiving disability-related
supports, or communicating with medical personnel or caregivers regarding the student’s health
during the school day.
(3) “LEA” means local education agency, which is the District of Columbia
Public Schools system or any individual public charter school or group of public charter schools
operating under a single charter.
(4) “Personal wireless communication device” means a cellular phone, tablet
computer, laptop computer, or gaming device that is not owned or provided by the school.
(5) “Possessing” means carrying or holding an item on one’s person but does not
include carrying or holding an item in a backpack, purse, handbag, or other personal carryall.
Sec. 3. LEA requirements for a personal wireless communication device policy.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) No later than 15 days before the start of the 2026-2027 School Year, each LEA
serving students enrolled in grades K-12 shall adopt and implement a personal wireless
communication device policy that prohibits K-12 students from, at a minimum, possessing a
personal wireless communication device on school premises at any time during the full school
day.
(b) An LEA’s personal wireless communication device policy may include exemptions
for a student possessing a personal wireless communication device for specific educational
purposes and to manage a student’s health care needs.
(c) Each LEA’s personal wireless communication device policy shall:
(1) Establish consequences if a student violates the policy; provided, that the
consequences shall be consistent with section 204 of the Attendance Accountability Amendment
Act of 2013, effective August 25, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-157; DC Official Code § 38-236.04);
(2) Establish a process and timeline for the LEA to assess whether the policy is
working and how to refine it;
(3) Be published on the LEA’s website no later than 15 days before the start of
each school year for which the policy is in effect, and that mid-year modifications shall be
published no later than 15 days before being effective;
(4) Be communicated to all enrolled families before the first day of school; and
(5) Be communicated to all LEA employees, contractors, and volunteers who
have contact with students during school hours.
(d) Each LEA’s personal wireless communication device policy shall require each school
in the LEA to:
(1) Identify how a parent or guardian of an enrolled student should communicate
urgent information to their child during the full school day;
(2) Identify how the school will communicate with families in cases of
emergency; and
(3) Identify appropriate storage for students’ personal wireless communication
devices during the full school day.
Sec. 4. State education agency responsibilities.
By March 1, 2026, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall develop and
share with LEAs a model policy that meets the requirements prescribed in section 3.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3